Hawaii, session 2026, GM1168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that increasing local
agricultural production is essential to the long-term
sustainability and food security of the State. However, local
agricultural producers face significant economic challenges,
particularly with the high costs of transporting agricultural
products and necessary supplies across the State. In a recent
survey report on Hawaii commercial agricultural expansion,
thirty-nine per cent of participating local ranchers and farmers
cited shipping and transportation costs as a leading barrier to
the expansion of their agricultural production. These
transportation costs place undue strain and financial burdens on
farmers and ranchers, limiting their ability to compete in local
markets and reducing the overall productivity of Hawaii's
agricultural sector. Additionally, in response to the economic
tariffs being implemented by the Trump administration, the
department of transportation harbors division reported that
effective July 1, 2025, the tariff for wharfage and pipeline
2026-3397 HB1707 GDI HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO. S';
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
toll rates will reflect a 4.1 per cent increase, further adding
to the strain on local producers.
The legislature recognizes that, to successfully scale up
local production, the establishment of a cost reimbursement
program that offsets the increased transportation costs of
agricultural producers is necessary to ensure growth in the
agricultural sector. The financial relief provided by a cost
reimbursement program would help strengthen’ local agriculture,
encourage greater self-sufficiency, support the State's broader
efforts to diversify its economy, and promote sustainable
agricultural practices.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a
local agriculture transportation cost reimbursement pilot
program to ensure that certain local agricultural producers,
including those that manage livestock and produce essential
commodities and those engaged in floriculture and nursery
production, receive support to offset the high costs of
transporting goods to market and to obtain necessary supplies.
SECTION 2. Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
2026-3397 HB1707 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiniiiinnHiiiMiiiiiMi

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D, 1
”§141- Local agriculture transportation cost
reimbursement pilot program; rules. (a) There is established
within the department of agriculture and biosecurity a local
agriculture transportation cost reimbursement pilot program to
reimburse eligible agricultural producers for a portion of the
producer's costs to transport agricultural commodities.
(b) To be eligible to receive reimbursement payments
pursuant to this section, an agricultural producer shall:
(1) Be an owner of livestock or a producer of agricultural
commodities in the State; a cooperative aggregator or
food hub; or a start-up or small-scale farmer, with
proof of commercial intent, that earns below the
threshold of gross receipts under paragraph (3);
(2) In£ur c£sts for t raj}^£O£tdmg iji a coyeredjrnot^^
vehicle or through air cargo, parcel, or water cargo
carrier services:
(A) Livestock, livestock products, or agricultural
commodities to market within the State; or
(B) Necessary supplies for the use of the
agricultural producer; and
2026-3397 HB1707 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4 H.B. NO. jsj
C.D. 1
(3) Provide to the department of agriculture and
biosecurity proof that the agricultural producer has
annual gross receipts totaling $2,500 or more or, if
the agricultural producer is a start-up or small-scale
farmer, provide to the department proof of commercial
intent.
(c) The total amount of reimbursement payments disbursed
pursuant to this section shall not exceed $2,000,000 in any
year. No single producer shall receive more than $25,000 or
fifty per cent of the producer's eligible transportation costs
per fiscal year, whichever is less, and no single cooperative
aggregator or food hub shall receive more than $50,000 or fifty
per cent of the aggregator's or food hub's eligible
transportation costs per fiscal year, whichever is less.
(d) The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall
submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty
days prior to the convening of each regular session. The report
shall include;
(1) The total number of producers reimbursed;
(2) The total amount of funds disbursed; and
2026-3397 HB1707 CDl HMSO 4

Page 5
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(3) Any recommendations for improvements or modifications
to the program, including any proposed legislation.
(e) The department of agriculture and biosecurity may
establish rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out
the purposes of this section.
(f) For the purposes of this section:
"Agricultural commodity" has the same meaning as defined in
section 145-21, including nursery production and honey.
"Covered motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle:
(1) Registered and owned by an owner of livestock or a
producer of agricultural commodities in the State; and
(2) Used for the transport of livestock, livestock
products, agricultural commodities, and necessary
supplies within the State.
"Necessary supplies" means chemicals, feed, fertilizer,
fuel, seeds, plants, supplies, equipment parts, and other inputs
as determined by the department of agriculture and biosecurity."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
department of agriculture and biosecurity to fund and administer
2026-3397 HB1707 CDl HMSO 5
iiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiniiin

Page 6
H.B. NO. £
C.D. 1
the local agriculture transportation cost reimbursement pilot
program established pursuant to this Act.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $55,200 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to
establish and fund one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) position
within the department of agriculture and biosecurity to
administer the local agriculture transportation cost
reimbursement pilot program established pursuant to this Act.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and
shall be repealed on June 30, 2029.
2026-3397 HB1707 CDl HMSO

H.B. NO. 1707
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1707, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1707, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
151-26